src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-PstAct-deverbals_gt-norm.yaml
    выесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выев
    выесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выевши
    выесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выевши
    выесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выевший
    выесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выевший
    съесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: съев
    съесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: съев
    съесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: съевши
    съесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: съевши
    съесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: съевший
    съесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: съевший
    поклясться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: поклявшись
    поклясться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: поклявшийся
    выехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выехав
    выехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выехавши
    выехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выехавший
    проехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: проехав
    проехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: проехавши
    проехать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: проехавший
    зареветь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: заревев
    зареветь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: заревевши
    зареветь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: заревевший
    вышибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: вышибив
    вышибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: вышибив
    вышибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вышибивши
    вышибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: вышибивши
    вышибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вышибивший
    вышибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вышибивший
    ушибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: ушибив
    ушибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: ушибив
    ушибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: ушибивши
    ушибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: ушибивши
    ушибить+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: ушибивший
    ушибить+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: ушибивший
